Hawaii statutes.
§105-4 Enforcement; duties of sheriffs and
police officers. The sheriff and the sheriff's deputies, or any police
officer, within their respective jurisdictions, shall investigate any
violation, or suspected violation of, and shall enforce section 105-1. [L 1949,
c 389, pt of §1(d); RL 1955, §7-13; am L 1963, c 85, §3; HRS §105-4; gen ch
1985]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next